Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.360.050 and 2024 c 248 s 3 and 2024 c 217 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) A medical assistant-certified may perform the following duties delegated by, and under the supervision of, a health care practitioner:(a) Fundamental procedures:(i) Wrapping items for autoclaving;(ii) Procedures for sterilizing equipment and instruments;(iii) Disposing of biohazardous materials; and(iv) Practicing standard precautions.(b) Clinical procedures:(i) Performing aseptic procedures in a setting other than a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW;(ii) Preparing of and assisting in sterile procedures in a setting other than a hospital under chapter 70.41 RCW;(iii) Taking vital signs;(iv) Preparing patients for examination;(v) Capillary blood withdrawal, venipuncture, and intradermal, subcutaneous, and intramuscular injections; and(vi) Observing and reporting patients' signs or symptoms.(c) Specimen collection:(i) Capillary puncture and venipuncture;(ii) Obtaining specimens for microbiological testing; and(iii) Instructing patients in proper technique to collect urine and fecal specimens.(d) Diagnostic testing:(i) Electrocardiography;(ii) Respiratory testing; and(iii)(A) Tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program on July 1, 2013. The department shall periodically update the tests authorized under this subsection (1)(d) based on changes made by the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program; and(B) Moderate complexity tests if the medical assistant-certified meets standards for personnel qualifications and responsibilities in compliance with federal regulation for nonwaived testing.(e) Patient care:(i) Telephone and in-person screening limited to intake and gathering of information without requiring the exercise of judgment based on clinical knowledge;(ii) Obtaining vital signs;(iii) Obtaining and recording patient history;(iv) Preparing and maintaining examination and treatment areas;(v) Preparing patients for, and assisting with, routine and specialty examinations, procedures, treatments, and minor office surgeries;(vi) Maintaining medication and immunization records; and(vii) Screening and following up on test results as directed by a health care practitioner.(f)(i) Administering medications. A medical assistant-certified may only administer medications if the drugs are:(A) Administered only by unit or single dosage, or by a dosage calculated and verified by a health care practitioner. For purposes of this section, a combination or multidose vaccine shall be considered a unit dose;(B) Limited to legend drugs, vaccines, and Schedule III-V controlled substances as authorized by a health care practitioner under the scope of his or her license and consistent with rules adopted by the secretary under (f)(ii) of this subsection; and(C) Administered pursuant to a written order from a health care practitioner.(ii) A medical assistant-certified may not administer experimental drugs or chemotherapy agents. The secretary may, by rule, further limit the drugs that may be administered under this subsection (1)(f). The rules adopted under this subsection must limit the drugs based on risk, class, or route.(iii) A medical assistant-certified may administer intramuscular injections for the purposes of treating known or suspected syphilis infection without immediate supervision if a health care practitioner is providing supervision through interactive audio or video telemedicine technology in accordance with RCW 18.360.010(((11)))(14)(c)(ii).(g) Intravenous injections. A medical assistant-certified may establish intravenous lines for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes, without administering medications, under the supervision of a health care practitioner, and administer intravenous injections for diagnostic or therapeutic agents under the direct visual supervision of a health care practitioner if the medical assistant-certified meets minimum standards established by the secretary in rule. The minimum standards must be substantially similar to the qualifications for category D and F health care assistants as they exist on July 1, 2013.(h) Urethral catheterization when appropriately trained.(i) Enter and activate orders for health care services, as delegated by a supervising health care practitioner in accordance with section 2 of this act.(2) A medical assistant-hemodialysis technician may perform hemodialysis when delegated and supervised by a health care practitioner. A medical assistant-hemodialysis technician may also administer drugs and oxygen to a patient when delegated and supervised by a health care practitioner and pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary.(3) A medical assistant-phlebotomist may perform:(a) Capillary, venous, or arterial invasive procedures for blood withdrawal when delegated and supervised by a health care practitioner and pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary;(b) Tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program on July 1, 2013. The department shall periodically update the tests authorized under this section based on changes made by the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program;(c) Moderate and high complexity tests if the medical assistant-phlebotomist meets standards for personnel qualifications and responsibilities in compliance with federal regulation for nonwaived testing; and(d) Electrocardiograms.(4) A medical assistant-registered may perform the following duties delegated by, and under the supervision of, a health care practitioner:(a) Fundamental procedures:(i) Wrapping items for autoclaving;(ii) Procedures for sterilizing equipment and instruments;(iii) Disposing of biohazardous materials; and(iv) Practicing standard precautions.(b) Clinical procedures:(i) Preparing for sterile procedures;(ii) Taking vital signs;(iii) Preparing patients for examination; and(iv) Observing and reporting patients' signs or symptoms.(c) Specimen collection:(i) Obtaining specimens for microbiological testing; and(ii) Instructing patients in proper technique to collect urine and fecal specimens.(d) Patient care:(i) Telephone and in-person screening limited to intake and gathering of information without requiring the exercise of judgment based on clinical knowledge;(ii) Obtaining vital signs;(iii) Obtaining and recording patient history;(iv) Preparing and maintaining examination and treatment areas;(v) Preparing patients for, and assisting with, routine and specialty examinations, procedures, treatments, and minor office surgeries, including those with minimal sedation. The department may, by rule, prohibit duties authorized under this subsection (4)(d)(v) if performance of those duties by a medical assistant-registered would pose an unreasonable risk to patient safety;(vi) Maintaining medication and immunization records; and(vii) Screening and following up on test results as directed by a health care practitioner.(e) Diagnostic testing and electrocardiography.(f)(i) Tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program on July 1, 2013. The department shall periodically update the tests authorized under subsection (1)(d) of this section based on changes made by the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program.(ii) Moderate complexity tests if the medical assistant-registered meets standards for personnel qualifications and responsibilities in compliance with federal regulation for nonwaived testing.(g) Administering eye drops, topical ointments, and vaccines, including combination or multidose vaccines.(h) Urethral catheterization when appropriately trained.(i) Administering medications:(i) A medical assistant-registered may only administer medications if the drugs are:(A) Administered only by unit or single dosage, or by a dosage calculated and verified by a health care practitioner. For purposes of this section, a combination or multidose vaccine shall be considered a unit dose;(B) Limited to legend drugs, vaccines, and Schedule III through V controlled substances as authorized by a health care practitioner under the scope of his or her license and consistent with rules adopted by the secretary under (i)(ii) of this subsection; and(C) Administered pursuant to a written order from a health care practitioner.(ii) A medical assistant-registered may only administer medication for intramuscular injections. A medical assistant-registered may not administer experimental drugs or chemotherapy agents. The secretary may, by rule, further limit the drugs that may be administered under this subsection (4)(i). The rules adopted under this subsection must limit the drugs based on risk, class, or route.(j)(i) Intramuscular injections. A medical assistant-registered may administer intramuscular injections for diagnostic or therapeutic agents under the immediate supervision of a health care practitioner if the medical assistant-registered meets minimum standards established by the secretary in rule.(ii) A medical assistant-registered may administer intramuscular injections for the purposes of treating known or suspected syphilis infection without immediate supervision if a health care practitioner is providing supervision through interactive audio or video telemedicine technology in accordance with RCW 18.360.010(((11)))(14)(c)(ii).(5)(a) A medical assistant-EMT may perform the following duties delegated by, and under the supervision of, a health care practitioner if the duties are within the scope, training, and endorsements of the medical assistant-EMT's emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, or paramedic certification:(i) Fundamental procedures:(A) Disposing of biohazardous materials; and(B) Practicing standard precautions;(ii) Clinical procedures:(A) Taking vital signs;(B) Preparing patients for examination;(C) Observing and reporting patients' signs or symptoms;(D) Simple eye irrigation;(E) Hemorrhage control with direct pressure or hemostatic gauze;(F) Spinal and extremity motion restriction and immobilization;(G) Oxygen administration;(H) Airway maintenance, stabilization, and suctioning;(I) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and(J) Use of automated external defibrillators and semiautomated external defibrillators;(iii) Specimen collection:(A) Capillary puncture and venipuncture; and(B) Instructing patients in proper technique to collect urine and fecal specimens;(iv) Diagnostic testing:(A) Electrocardiography; and(B) Respiratory testing, including nasopharyngeal swabbing for COVID-19;(v) Patient care:(A) Telephone and in-person screening, limited to intake and gathering of information without requiring the exercise of judgment based on clinical knowledge;(B) Obtaining vital signs;(C) Obtaining and recording patient history; and(D) Preparing and maintaining examination and treatment areas;(vi) Administering medications: A medical assistant-EMT may only administer medications if the drugs are:(A) Administered only by unit or single dosage, or by a dosage calculated and verified by a health care practitioner. For purposes of this subsection, a combination or multidose vaccine shall be considered a unit dose;(B) Limited to vaccines, opioid antagonists, and oral glucose, as authorized by a health care practitioner under the scope of his or her license and consistent with rules adopted by the secretary under (b) of this subsection; and(C) Administered pursuant to a written order from a health care practitioner; and(vii) Establishing intravenous lines: A medical assistant-EMT may establish intravenous lines for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes, without administering medications, and remove intravenous lines under the supervision of a health care practitioner.(b) The secretary may, by rule, further limit the drugs that may be administered under this subsection. The rules adopted under this subsection must limit the drugs based on risk, class, or route.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.360 RCW to read as follows:(1) A medical assistant-certified may enter an order for health care services into an entry-order system and activate such order if:(a) There is a standing written protocol that authorizes designated medical assistants-certified to enter and activate an order for certain health care services, as included in an order set maintained by the facility or supervising health care practitioner, and the protocol:(i) Details the clinical criteria that would initiate an order; and(ii) Is reviewed and revised annually, or more frequently as needed;(b) The standing written protocol authorizes the medical assistant-certified to enter and activate orders for the following:(i) Routine adult or child immunizations that do not require clinical judgment;(ii) Routine screening tests, such as mammograms, fecal occult stool cards, and bone density scans;(iii) Routine labs for chronic disease monitoring, such as diabetes, hypertension, and hypothyroidism;(iv) Routine diagnostic imaging tests, such as x-ray, magnetic resonance imaging, computed tomography, and ultrasound;(v) Therapeutic procedures, such as osteoporosis treatment, nebulizer treatments, and cryotherapy;(vi) Procedure and surgical treatment orders, including minor in-office procedures, such as wound closure, lesion excision, joint injections, and aspirations, as well as orders for surgical interventions and other operative procedures as medically indicated;(vii) Point of care tests and tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments program, as included in the authorized duties of a medical assistant-certified under RCW 18.360.050, such as rapid strep, urinalysis, pregnancy, and blood glucose monitoring;(viii) Routine medication refills that have no changes in dosage or frequency;(ix) Referrals;(x) Perioperative order sets including referrals, labs, durable medical equipment, and radiologic exams; and(xi) Supportive devices and therapeutic applications, such as durable medical equipment, including glucometers, walkers, shower chairs, continuous positive airway pressure machines, and the application or removal of splints and casts;(c) The medical assistant-certified has completed training regarding order-entry systems as specified in subsection (3) of this section;(d) The delegated order is in compliance with RCW 18.360.060; and(e) The order is not a prescription for a controlled substance, as defined in RCW 69.50.101. If the order is for a prescription for a controlled substance, the medical assistant-certified may enter, but not activate, the order.(2) Pursuant to facility policy but within 72 hours of activation, a supervising health care practitioner must review and countersign an order that was entered and activated by a medical assistant-certified pursuant to this section.(3)(a) A medical assistant-certified may only enter and activate orders in accordance with this section if the medical assistant-certified has received training from a supervising health care practitioner regarding order-entry systems. The training must cover the scope of permitted tasks, when to obtain clarification from a supervising health care practitioner, and compliance with regulatory requirements.(b) The employer of a medical assistant-certified must maintain records regarding participation in order-entry training.(4) Upon department request, including during any on-site facility surveys conducted by the department, an employer of a medical assistant-certified must provide documentation to the department demonstrating compliance with the training and countersignature requirements of this section.(5) Nothing in this section limits the scope or duties of other medical assistant types certified or registered under this chapter.(6) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 3. RCW 18.360.060 and 2013 c 128 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Prior to delegation of any of the functions in RCW 18.360.050, a health care practitioner shall determine to the best of his or her ability each of the following:(a) That the task is within that health care practitioner's scope of licensure or authority;(b) That the task is indicated for the patient;(c) The appropriate level of supervision;(d) That no law prohibits the delegation;(e) That the person to whom the task will be delegated is competent to perform that task; and(f) That the task itself is one that should be appropriately delegated when considering the following factors:(i) That the task can be performed without requiring the exercise of judgment based on clinical knowledge;(ii) That results of the task are reasonably predictable;(iii) That the task can be performed without a need for complex observations or critical decisions;(iv) That the task can be performed without repeated clinical assessments; and(v)(A) For a medical assistant other than a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, that the task, if performed improperly, would not present life-threatening consequences or the danger of immediate and serious harm to the patient; and(B) For a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, that the task, if performed improperly, is not likely to present life-threatening consequences or the danger of immediate and serious harm to the patient.(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of protocols that do not involve clinical judgment and do not involve the administration of medications, other than vaccines.(3) The entry and activation of orders by a medical assistant-certified in accordance with section 2 of this act is not considered a task that requires the exercise of judgment based on clinical experience.Sec. 4. RCW 18.360.010 and 2024 c 248 s 2 and 2024 c 217 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Activate" means to send an order for health care services to the appropriate recipient in such a manner that the order may be acted upon immediately by the recipient.(2) "Administer" means the retrieval of medication, and its application to a patient, as authorized in RCW 18.360.050.(((2)))(3) "Delegation" means direct authorization granted by a licensed health care practitioner to a medical assistant to perform the functions authorized in this chapter which fall within the scope of practice of the health care provider and the training and experience of the medical assistant.(((3)))(4) "Department" means the department of health.(((4)))(5) "Forensic phlebotomist" means a police officer, law enforcement officer, or employee of a correctional facility or detention facility, who is certified under this chapter and meets any additional training and proficiency standards of his or her employer to collect a venous blood sample for forensic testing pursuant to a search warrant, a waiver of the warrant requirement, or exigent circumstances.(((5)))(6) "Health care practitioner" means:(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;(b) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; or(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW.(((6)))(7) "Medical assistant-certified" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who assists a health care practitioner with patient care, executes administrative and clinical procedures, and performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of the health care practitioner.(((7)))(8) "Medical assistant-EMT" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner and holds: An emergency medical technician certification under RCW 18.73.081; an advanced emergency medical technician certification under RCW 18.71.205; or a paramedic certification under RCW 18.71.205.(((8)))(9) "Medical assistant-hemodialysis technician" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs hemodialysis and other functions pursuant to RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner.(((9)))(10) "Medical assistant-phlebotomist" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs capillary, venous, and arterial invasive procedures for blood withdrawal and other functions pursuant to RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner.(((10)))(11) "Medical assistant-registered" means a person registered under RCW 18.360.040 who, pursuant to an endorsement by a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice, assists a health care practitioner with patient care, executes administrative and clinical procedures, and performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of the health care practitioner.(((11)))(12) "Order set" means a written or electronic predefined template of medical orders that are grouped together for efficiency and convenience, in order to reduce errors by standardizing treatment for specific conditions.(13) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.(((12)))(14)(a) "Supervision" means supervision of procedures permitted pursuant to this chapter by a health care practitioner who is physically present and is immediately available in the facility, except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection.(b) The health care practitioner does not need to be present during procedures to withdraw blood, administer vaccines, or obtain specimens for or perform diagnostic testing, but must be immediately available.(c)(i) During a telemedicine visit, supervision over a medical assistant assisting a health care practitioner with the telemedicine visit may be provided through interactive audio and video telemedicine technology.(ii) When administering intramuscular injections for the purposes of treating a known or suspected syphilis infection in accordance with RCW 18.360.050, a medical assistant-certified or medical assistant-registered may be supervised through interactive audio or video telemedicine technology.--- END ---